Maryland, session 2025, HB1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–805.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1282*

HOUSE BILL 1282
(6) “Social media application” means any program, software, or website
that allows a person to become a registered user for the purpose of establishing personal
relationships with one or more other users through:
(i) direct or real–time communication; or
(ii) the creation of websites or profiles capable of being viewed by the
public or other users.
SUBTITLE 8. PROMOTING OR CONDONING CRIMINAL ACTIVITY ON SOCIAL MEDIA
APPLICATION.
10–801.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “SOCIAL MEDIA APPLICATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–805 OF THIS ARTICLE.
10–802.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT UPLOAD A VIDEO OF AN ACTION THAT IS A CRIME
UNDER THE LAW OF THE STATE OR FEDERAL LAW TO A SOCIAL MEDIA APPLICATION
WITH THE INTENT TO PROMOTE OR CONDONE THE ACTIVITY.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.